North Carolina, session 2025, HB350.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 53A of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 14-409.13. Report of loss or theft of firearm.
(a) Any owner of a firearm as defined in G.S. 14-408.1(a) shall report the loss or theft of
the firearm within 24 hours after the discovery of the loss or theft to either (i) the local law
enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the location where the loss or theft of the firearm
occurred or (ii) the State Bureau of Investigation. The report required by this subsection shall
include, to the extent known, all of the following:
(1) The firearm's caliber, make, model, manufacturer, and serial number.
(2) Any other distinguishing number or identification mark on the firearm.
(3) The circumstances of the loss or theft, including the date, place, and manner.
(b) If a local law enforcement agency or the State Bureau of Investigation receives a
report pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the agency or Bureau shall enter the information
set forth in subdivisions (1) and (2) of subsection (a) of this section, to the extent known, into the
National Crime Information Center database.
(c) A violation of this section is a Class 3 misdemeanor; however, a second or subsequent
violation of this section is a Class I felony."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
*H350-v-1*